Florida, session 2026, SB1390.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as âVassalloâs Law.â 21 Section 2.âSection 901.155, Florida Statutes, is created to 22 read: 23 901.155âPersons who surrender to law enforcement when no 24 warrant has been issued.â 25 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 26 (a)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as in s. 27 943.10(1). 28 (b)ââOfficeâ means the office of a law enforcement agency 29 which is accessible to the public. 30 (c)ââSurrendering personâ means a person who enters an 31 office and attempts to be taken into custody by a law 32 enforcement agency for a violation of criminal law when no 33 warrant for such personâs arrest has been issued. 34 (2)âA law enforcement agency shall implement a procedure 35 for interviewing a surrendering person. Each law enforcement 36 agency may develop its own procedure, which must include, but 37 need not be limited to, all of the following: 38 (a)âThe staff member who greets persons who enter the 39 office shall do all of the following: 40 1.âDocument identification and contact information for the 41 surrendering person. 42 2.âNotify an onsite law enforcement officer that a 43 surrendering person has come to the office. 44 3.âDetermine whether the law enforcement agency has issued 45 an alert to be on the lookout for a person who meets the 46 description of the surrendering person. 47 (b)âUpon notification that a surrendering person has come 48 to the office, a law enforcement officer shall immediately 49 respond to the place where the surrendering person is located 50 and shall conduct a voluntary interview of such person. 51 (c)âIf, while interviewing the surrendering person, the law 52 enforcement officer determines that such person may have 53 committed a criminal offense in another jurisdiction, the law 54 enforcement officer must determine whether the law enforcement 55 agency in the other jurisdiction has issued an alert to be on 56 the lookout for a person who meets the description of the 57 surrendering person. 58 (3)âA law enforcement officer who interviews a surrendering 59 person under this section may: 60 (a)âTemporarily detain or arrest such person if the 61 requirements of s. 901.151 are met. 62 (b)âArrest such person without a warrant if any of the 63 circumstances in s. 901.15 arise. 64 (4)âIf a law enforcement officer who interviews a 65 surrendering person under this section determines that such 66 person appears to meet the criteria for involuntary examination 67 pursuant to s. 394.463, he or she must deliver the person or 68 have him or her delivered to the nearest receiving facility for 69 examination and must execute a written report detailing the 70 circumstances under which the person was taken into custody. 71 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.